Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3601
Act, how cited.

Sections 30-3601 to 30-3604 shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform Testamentary Additions to Trusts Act (1991).

Laws 1999, LB 18, § 1.